Utah statutes.
53A-1-302.   Compensation of state superintendent -- Other board employees.

(1)  The board shall establish the compensation of the state superintendent.

(2)  The board may appoint other employees as necessary for the proper administration and supervision of the public school system.  The compensation and duties of these other employees shall be established by the board and paid from money appropriated for that purpose.



Amended by Chapter 261, 1990 General Session

